Louisiana, session 2026, HB1241.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:2472 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2472. Child support insurance intercept; insurer compliance; enforcement
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Claimant" means a person who files a liability claim for bodily injury or
wrongful death or a claim for workers' compensation benefits.
(2) "Claim for bodily injury" does not mean a claim filed under the uninsured
or underinsured coverage of a motor vehicle liability policy.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1241 ENROLLED
(3) "Insurance claim data collection organization" means an organization that
maintains a centralized database of information concerning insurance claims to assist
insurers subscribed to the database in processing claims, detecting and preventing
fraud, and cooperating and coordinating with the federal or state child support
entities to share relevant information for insurance intercept purposes.
(4) "Office" means the office of child support within the Department of
Children and Family Services.
(5) "Qualifying payment" means a payment that is either a one-time lump
sum or an installment payment issued by an insurer doing business in the state,
which is made for the purpose of satisfying, compromising, or settling an insurance
claim for general damages or lost wages where the payment is in excess of five
hundred dollars and is intended to be paid directly to the claimant and not to a third
party, such as a healthcare provider. "Qualifying payment" includes any payment
scheduled to be issued after a data match conducted pursuant to this Section.
B. Every insurer doing business in this state shall comply with the obligation
to conduct data matches and to withhold and remit qualifying payments when
notified by the Department of Children and Family Services.
C.(1) Each insurer shall, prior to issuing a qualifying payment, exchange
information with the office in a manner prescribed by the Department of Children
and Family Services to verify whether a claimant owes a debt for the support of one
or more children to the Department of Children and Family Services or to a person
receiving services from the office.
(2) To the extent feasible, the office shall facilitate a secure electronic
process to exchange information with insurers pursuant to this Section. The
obligation of an insurer to exchange information with the office is discharged upon
complying with the requirements of this Section. The exchange of information shall
comply with privacy protections under applicable state and federal laws and
regulations, including but not limited to the federal Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1241 ENROLLED
D. To determine whether a claimant owes a debt being enforced by the
office, all insurers doing business in the state that issue qualifying payments to a
claimant shall provide minimum identifying information about the claimant to the
office, which may include the transmission of information to an insurance claim data
collection organization, the federal office of child support enforcement, the child
support lien network, or directly to the office in a manner prescribed by the
commissioner. Minimum identifying information may include the claimant's full
name, current physical address, and date of birth. The insurer shall provide the
claimant's social security number or other taxpayer identification number only if that
information is available in the insurer's records and is necessary to identify the
claimant.
E. If an insurer is notified by the office that a claimant owes a debt for the
support of one or more children to the Department of Children and Family Services
or to a person receiving services from the office, the insurer shall, upon the receipt
of a notice issued by the Department of Children and Family Services identifying the
amount of debt owed, withhold from payment to the claimant the amount specified
in the notice and remit the amount withheld from the payment to the Department of
Children and Family Services within twenty days of receipt of the notice. No later
than sixty days after the Department of Children and Family Services receives a
payment pursuant to this Subsection the department shall determine the accuracy of
the amount actually owed and return any amount not owed to the claimant.
F. The Department of Children and Family Services shall give priority over
any withholding of payment pursuant to Subsection E of this Section to any lien,
claim, or demand for reasonable claim-related attorneys' fees, litigation expenses,
any portion of a claim based on damage or a loss of real or personal property,
documented unpaid expenses incurred for medical treatment causally related to the
claim, and any money assigned or designated as funeral or burial expenses.
G.(1) The Department of Children and Family Services shall consider any
information received from an insurer pursuant to this Section as confidential. Such
information shall be used or disclosed by the Department of Children and Family
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1241 ENROLLED
Services only for the purpose of collecting past due child support or for the purpose
of carrying out the provisions of this Section.
(2) Information provided by the Department of Children and Family Services
shall not be used by the insurer or its agent for any purpose other than conducting a
data match pursuant to this Section and shall not be disclosed to any person except
to the extent necessary to conduct the data match.
(3) An insurer or other entity shall not be held liable in any civil or criminal
action for any act made in good faith pursuant to this Section, including but not
limited to:
(a) Any disclosure of information to the Department of Children and Family
Services.
(b) The payment of a claim for which a portion of the payment was eligible
for remittance to the Department of Children and Family Services if the insurer was
unaware that the payment was eligible for remittance after conducting a data match.
(c) The withholding of any money from payment to a claimant or the
remittance of such money to the Department of Children and Family Services.
H. An insurer shall not delay the disbursement of a payment to a claimant
to comply with this Section, if doing so would subject the insurer to penalties
including but not limited to those provided for in R.S. 22:1892; however, the insurer
shall otherwise provide a reasonable opportunity for the office to respond to a data
match request prior to issuing a qualifying payment. In the case of periodic
payments, an insurer is not required to comply with Subsection E of this Section with
regard to any payments disbursed before receipt of the notice, but shall comply with
Subsection E of this Section with regard to any payments scheduled after receipt of
the notice.
I. If periodic payments will be made to a claimant, the insurer shall, prior to
issuing each qualifying payment, exchange information with the office in a manner
prescribed by the Department of Children and Family Services, as provided in
Subsection C of this Section to verify whether the claimant owes a debt for the
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1241 ENROLLED
support of one or more children to the Department of Children and Family Services
or to a person receiving services from the office.
J. The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations for the
implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.